Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4686.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 7404a. (1) An individual who meets all of the following requirements is not in violation of section 7401, 7403, or 7404 for creating, manufacturing, possessing, or using psilocyn: (a) The individual is 18 years of age or older. (b) The individual possesses not more 2 ounces of a substance that contains psilocyn. (c) The individual possesses the substance containing psilocyn only for personal use. (d) The individual possesses a medical record that demonstrates the individual has a diagnosis of post-traumatic stress disorder. (2) An individual who meets all of the following requirements is not in violation of section 7401, 7403, or 7404 for creating, manufacturing, possessing, or using psilocybin: (a) The individual is 18 years of age or older. (b) The individual possesses not more than 2 ounces of a substance that contains psilocybin. (c) The individual possesses the substance containing psilocybin only for personal use. (d) The individual possesses a medical record that demonstrates the individual has a diagnosis of post-traumatic stress disorder.